Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5616.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 Sec. 101. Subject to part 2, there is appropriated from the general fund of this state for special maintenance projects for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, $900.00 or as much of that amount as necessary. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET Special maintenance projects as described and recommended in the capital outlay budget for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. The allocations to be made by the director of the department of technology, management, and budget in order of program priority and need of the various institutions $ 900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 900 State general fund/general purpose $ 900 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS general sections Sec. 201. Subject to conditions in this part, there is appropriated from the general fund of this state for remodeling, renovation, moving, or demolition of and additions to structures and other physical properties, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, $100.00 or as much of that amount as necessary. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 Remodeling of and additions to structures and other physical properties as described and recommended in the capital outlay budget for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. The allocations to be made by the director of the department of technology, management, and budget in order of program priority and need of the various institutions $ 100 TOTAL REMODELING AND ADDITIONS $ 100 Sec. 301. Subject to conditions in this part, there is appropriated from the general fund of this state for fire protection at various state institutions for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, $100.00 or as much of that amount as necessary. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET Fire protection projects $ 100 TOTAL FIRE PROTECTION $ 100 Sec. 401. Subject to conditions in this part, there is appropriated from the general fund of this state for occupational safety and health projects at state agencies and institutions for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, $100.00 or as much of that amount as necessary. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Occupational safety and health projects. Allocation to be made by the director of the department of technology, management, and budget based on actual OSHA inspections, in order of program priority and need of the various institutions and agencies $ 100 TOTAL OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH PROJECTS $ 100 Sec. 501. Subject to the provisions of the studies and preliminary planning process established by law, there is appropriated from the general fund of this state for preliminary studies and planning of proposed building projects at certain state institutions for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, $100.00 or as much of that amount as necessary. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET $ 100 TOTAL PRELIMINARY PLANNING PROJECTS $ 100 Sec. 601. Subject to conditions in this part, there is appropriated from the general fund of this state to the department of technology, management, and budget, except for state college and university projects, for land acquisition, planning, new construction and remodeling, renovation, moving, or demolition of and additions to structures and other physical properties for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, $100.00 or as much of that amount as necessary and in the following amounts: DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET $ 100 TOTAL GENERAL FUND $ 100 Sec. 701. Subject to conditions in this part, there is appropriated from the state park improvement account of this state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 for land acquisition, planning, new construction and remodeling, renovation, moving, or demolition of and additions to structures and other physical properties for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, $100.00 or as much of that amount as may be necessary and in the following amounts: DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES $ 100 TOTAL STATE PARK IMPROVEMENT ACCOUNT $ 100 Sec. 801. Subject to conditions in this part, there is appropriated from the waterways account of this state for land acquisition, planning, new construction and remodeling, renovation, moving, or demolition of and additions to structures and other physical properties for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, $100.00 or as much of that amount as necessary and in the following amounts: DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES Waterways $ 100 TOTAL WATERWAYS ACCOUNT $ 100 Sec. 901. Subject to conditions in this part, there is appropriated from the state trunkline fund of this state for land acquisition, planning, new construction and remodeling, renovation, moving, or demolition of and additions to structures and other physical properties for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, $100.00 or as much of that amount as necessary and in the following amounts: STATE TRANSPORTATION DEPARTMENT Special maintenance - various projects $ 100 TOTAL STATE TRUNKLINE FUND $ 100 Sec. 1001. Subject to conditions in this part, there is appropriated from the aeronautics fund of this state for land 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 acquisition, planning, new construction and remodeling, renovation, moving, or demolition of and additions to structures and other physical properties for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, $100.00 or as much of that amount as necessary and in the following amounts: STATE TRANSPORTATION DEPARTMENT $ 100 TOTAL AERONAUTICS FUND $ 100